dictionaries/sk_SK/src/Slovak.aff
SFX Y   y           ejšom/Fs   [bklmnprtv]y is:neuter is:locative
SFX Y   y           ejším/Fs   [bklmnprtv]y is:masculine is:instrumental
SFX Y   y           ejším/Fs   [bklmnprtv]y is:neuter is:instrumental
SFX Y   y           ejšou/Fs   [bklmnprtv]y is:feminine is:instrumental
SFX Y   y           ejšími/Fs  [bklmnprtv]y is:masculine is:instrumental is:plural
SFX Y   y           ejšími/Fs  [bklmnprtv]y is:feminine is:instrumental is:plural
SFX Y   y           ejšími/Fs  [bklmnprtv]y is:neuter is:instrumental is:plural
SFX Y   ý           ejšie/Fs   [bdhklmnprstvz]ý is:feminine is:nominative is:plural
SFX Y   ý           ejšie/Fs   [bdhklmnprstvz]ý is:neuter is:nominative is:plural
SFX Y   ý           ejšie/Fs   [bdhklmnprstvz]ý is:feminine is:accusative is:plural
SFX Y   ý           ejšie/Fs   [bdhklmnprstvz]ý is:neuter is:accusative is:plural
SFX Y   ý           ejšia/Fs   [bdhklmnprstvz]ý is:feminine is:nominative
SFX Y   ý           ejší/Fs    [bdhklmnprstvz]ý is:masculine is:nominative
SFX Y   ý           ejšieho/Fs [bdhklmnprstvz]ý is:masculine is:genitive
SFX Y   ý           ejšieho/Fs [bdhklmnprstvz]ý is:neuter is:genitive
SFX Y   ý           ejšieho/Fs [bdhklmnprstvz]ý is:masculine is:accusative
SFX Y   ý           ejšieho/Fs [bdhklmnprstvz]ý is:neuter is:accusative
SFX Y   ý           ejšej/Fs   [bdhklmnprstvz]ý is:feminine is:genitive
SFX Y   ý           ejších/Fs  [bdhklmnprstvz]ý is:masculine is:genitive is:plural
SFX Y   ý           ejších/Fs  [bdhklmnprstvz]ý is:feminine is:genitive is:plural
SFX Y   ý           ejších/Fs  [bdhklmnprstvz]ý is:neuter is:genitive is:plural
SFX Y   ý           ejších/Fs  [bdhklmnprstvz]ý is:masculine is:accusative is:plural
SFX Y   ý           ejších/Fs  [bdhklmnprstvz]ý is:feminine is:accusative is:plural
SFX Y   ý           ejších/Fs  [bdhklmnprstvz]ý is:neuter is:accusative is:plural
SFX Y   ý           ejšiemu/Fs [bdhklmnprstvz]ý is:masculine is:dative
SFX Y   ý           ejšiemu/Fs [bdhklmnprstvz]ý is:neuter is:dative
SFX Y   ý           ejšej/Fs   [bdhklmnprstvz]ý is:feminine is:dative
SFX Y   ý           ejšej/Fs   [bdhklmnprstvz]ý is:feminine is:locative
SFX Y   ý           ejším/Fs   [bdhklmnprstvz]ý is:masculine is:instrumental
SFX Y   ý           ejším/Fs   [bdhklmnprstvz]ý is:neuter is:instrumental
SFX Y   ý           ejším/Fs   [bdhklmnprstvz]ý is:masculine is:dative is:plural
SFX Y   ý           ejším/Fs   [bdhklmnprstvz]ý is:feminine is:dative is:plural
SFX Y   ý           ejším/Fs   [bdhklmnprstvz]ý is:neuter is:dative is:plural
SFX Y   ý           ejšiu/Fs   [bdhklmnprstvz]ý is:feminine is:accusative
SFX Y   ý           ejších/Fs  [bdhklmnprstvz]ý is:masculine is:locative is:plural
SFX Y   ý           ejších/Fs  [bdhklmnprstvz]ý is:feminine is:locative is:plural
SFX Y   ý           ejších/Fs  [bdhklmnprstvz]ý is:neuter is:locative is:plural
SFX Y   ý           ejšom/Fs   [bdhklmnprstvz]ý is:masculine is:locative
SFX Y   ý           ejšom/Fs   [bdhklmnprstvz]ý is:neuter is:locative
SFX Y   ý           ejšou/Fs   [bdhklmnprstvz]ý is:feminine is:instrumental
SFX Y   ý           ejšími/Fs  [bdhklmnprstvz]ý is:masculine is:instrumental is:plural
SFX Y   ý           ejšími/Fs  [bdhklmnprstvz]ý is:feminine is:instrumental is:plural
SFX Y   ý           ejšími/Fs  [bdhklmnprstvz]ý is:neuter is:instrumental is:plural
SFX Y   ý           šie/Fs     [dh]ý po:adverb
SFX Y   ý           šie/Fs     [dh]ý is:feminine is:nominative is:plural
SFX Y   ý           šie/Fs     [dh]ý is:neuter is:nominative is:plural
SFX Y   ý           šie/Fs     [dh]ý is:feminine is:accusative is:plural
SFX Y   ý           šie/Fs     [dh]ý is:neuter is:accusative is:plural
SFX Y   ý           šia/Fs     [dh]ý is:feminine is:nominative
SFX Y   ý           ší/Fs      [dh]ý is:masculine is:nominative
SFX Y   ý           ší/Fs      [dh]ý is:masculine is:nominative is:plural
SFX Y   ý           šieho/Fs   [dh]ý is:masculine is:genitive
SFX Y   ý           šieho/Fs   [dh]ý is:masculine is:accusative
SFX Y   ý           šieho/Fs   [dh]ý is:neuter is:genitive
SFX Y   ý           šej/Fs     [dh]ý is:feminine is:locative
SFX Y   ý           šej/Fs     [dh]ý is:feminine is:genitive
SFX Y   ý           ších/Fs    [dh]ý is:masculine is:locative is:plural
SFX Y   ý           ších/Fs    [dh]ý is:feminine is:locative is:plural
SFX Y   ý           ších/Fs    [dh]ý is:neuter is:locative is:plural
SFX Y   ý           šiemu/Fs   [dh]ý is:masculine is:dative
SFX Y   ý           šiemu/Fs   [dh]ý is:neuter is:dative
SFX Y   ý           šej/Fs     [dh]ý is:feminine is:dative
SFX Y   ý           ším/Fs     [dh]ý is:masculine is:dative is:plural
SFX Y   ý           ším/Fs     [dh]ý is:feminine is:dative is:plural
SFX Y   ý           ším/Fs     [dh]ý is:neuter is:dative is:plural
SFX Y   ý           ším/Fs     [dh]ý is:masculine is:instrumental
SFX Y   ý           ším/Fs     [dh]ý is:neuter is:instrumental
SFX Y   ý           šiu/Fs     [dh]ý is:feminine is:accusative
SFX Y   ý           ších/Fs    [dh]ý is:masculine is:genitive is:plural
SFX Y   ý           ších/Fs    [dh]ý is:neuter is:genitive is:plural
SFX Y   ý           ších/Fs    [dh]ý is:masculine is:accusative is:plural
SFX Y   ý           šom/Fs     [dh]ý is:masculine is:locative
SFX Y   ý           šom/Fs     [dh]ý is:neuter is:locative
SFX Y   ý           šou/Fs     [dh]ý is:feminine is:instrumental
SFX Y   ý           šími/Fs    [dh]ý is:masculine is:instrumental is:plural
SFX Y   ý           šími/Fs    [dh]ý is:feminine is:instrumental is:plural
SFX Y   ý           šími/Fs    [dh]ý is:neuter is:instrumental is:plural
